Washington statutes.
RCW 38.08.020

Governor as commander-in-chief—Adjutant general executive head.

The militia of the state not in the service of the United States shall be governed and its affairs administered pursuant to law, by the governor, as commander-in-chief, through the adjutant general's department, of which the adjutant general shall be the executive head.

[ 1961 c 210 s 1; 1943 c 130 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-3. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 2; 1909 c 134 ss 13, 14; 1895 c 108 s 13.]

NOTES:

Governor commander-in-chief: State Constitution Art. 3 s 8.